Illinois, session 104th, HB799.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Sections 21-90, 21-110, 21-115, 21-190, 21-205, 21-215, 621-225, 21-250, 21-350, 21-390, 22-5, 22-10, 22-40, and 22-65 7and by adding Sections 1-4, 1-71, 1-72, 1-153, 21-191, 21-192, 821-251, 22-42, and 22-43 as follows: 9    (35 ILCS 200/1-4 new)10    Sec. 1-4. Allowable costs; prohibited costs; maintenance.11    (a) For purposes of this Code, and for any tax sale, 12redemption, judicial tax deed auction, tax deed judgment, or 13surplus proceeds determination arising from a tax certificate 14issued on or after the effective date of this amendatory Act, 15"allowable costs" means only the following amounts, to the 16extent actually incurred, actually paid, reasonable in amount, 17directly tied to the specific parcel, and supported by written 18documentation:19        (1) delinquent taxes and special assessments lawfully 20    due;21        (2) statutory interest expressly authorized by this 22    Code;23        (3) court filing fees actually paid;  HB0799 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1        (4) service of process costs actually paid;2        (5) publication costs actually paid;3        (6) recording fees actually paid;4        (7) municipal advancements actually paid under Section 5    22-35;6        (8) selling officer fees expressly authorized by 7    statute or court order and actually paid; and8        (9) title search costs actually paid, only if 9    expressly authorized elsewhere in this Code and only in 10    the amount permitted by law.11    (b) "Maintenance" means only work reasonably necessary to 12secure, preserve, and prevent waste or nuisance conditions at 13property held by a county after issuance and recording of a tax 14deed and before redemption or judicial tax deed auction, 15limited to:16        (1) securing points of entry;17        (2) removal of garbage, debris, or hazardous refuse;18        (3) mowing grass and basic exterior upkeep necessary 19    to prevent nuisance conditions;20        (4) boarding or similar temporary protection measures;21        (5) abatement of objectively unsafe or hazardous 22    conditions required by applicable law; and23        (6) actions strictly necessary to comply with 24    applicable municipal health and safety requirements.25    (c) "Maintenance" does not include:26        (1) redevelopment;  HB0799 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1        (2) renovation;2        (3) rehabilitation beyond temporary securing or hazard 3    abatement;4        (4) capital improvements;5        (5) demolition, except where separately authorized by 6    other law and not charged to the former owner or deducted 7    from surplus proceeds;8        (6) project management charges;9        (7) consulting fees;10        (8) internal labor allocation;11        (9) overhead;12        (10) general administrative expenses;13        (11) insurance costs;14        (12) financing costs;15        (13) interest on county-incurred expenses;16        (14) legal fees, except as expressly and specifically 17    authorized elsewhere in this Code;18        (15) staff time valuation;19        (16) transportation costs, mileage, fleet use, or 20    equipment depreciation;21        (17) compliance monitoring costs not directly tied to 22    a specific and documented health or safety condition; or23        (18) any cost not expressly listed in subsection (b).24    (d) "Administrative costs" means only ministerial third 25party costs expressly authorized by statute and actually paid 26to a non-county third party in connection with the specific   HB0799 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1parcel at issue. "Administrative costs" does not include 2county overhead, employee compensation, fringe benefits, 3pension costs, office expenses, information technology 4expenses, general operating expenses, treasury expenses, legal 5department expenses, or any pro rata allocation of county 6operations.7    (e) "Overhead" means all internal governmental, 8contractor, portfolio, or enterprise expenses not directly and 9exclusively incurred for the specific parcel and expressly 10allowed by statute. Overhead is prohibited from inclusion in 11any redemption amount, tax deed judgment amount, minimum bid, 12or deduction from surplus proceeds.13    (f) Except as expressly provided in this Code, no fee, 14cost, charge, surcharge, assessment, contribution, 15reimbursement, or expense may be included in:16        (1) the redemption amount;17        (2) the tax deed judgment amount;18        (3) the minimum bid at judicial tax deed auction; or19        (4) any deduction from surplus proceeds.20    (g) The following are expressly prohibited from inclusion 21in the redemption amount, tax deed judgment amount, minimum 22bid, or any deduction from surplus proceeds:23        (1) maintenance costs, except as provided in 24    subsection (j) in the event of redemption;25        (2) county administrative costs;26        (3) county overhead;  HB0799 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1        (4) fund capitalization charges;2        (5) indemnity fund charges;3        (6) surplus account charges;4        (7) automation fund charges;5        (8) registry fees;6        (9) bidder registration fees;7        (10) assignment fees;8        (11) portfolio management charges;9        (12) anticipated future expenses;10        (13) estimated expenses not yet paid;11        (14) markups;12        (15) internal transfer pricing;13        (16) profit components;14        (17) contingency percentages;15        (18) carrying costs;16        (19) opportunity costs;17        (20) cost of capital;18        (21) investment loss or delay claims;19        (22) staff salary allocations;20        (23) attorney fee schedules, standard fee schedules, 21    or flat fee proxies not actually incurred and expressly 22    authorized by statute; and23        (24) any amount the primary purpose of which is to 24    generate revenue, capitalize a fund, subsidize operations, 25    or shift general governmental costs to the property owner.26    (h) No county, certificate holder, assignee, selling   HB0799 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1officer, or other party may characterize a prohibited cost as 2an allowable cost by relabeling it as preservation, servicing, 3administration, compliance, stabilization, case handling, 4asset management, collection support, or any substantially 5similar term.6    (i) If there is a dispute concerning whether a charge is 7allowable under this Section, the burden shall be on the party 8seeking inclusion of the charge to prove by written 9documentation that:10        (1) the charge is expressly permitted by statute;11        (2) the charge was actually incurred and actually 12    paid;13        (3) the charge was reasonable in amount;14        (4) the charge was directly tied to the specific 15    parcel; and16        (5) the charge is not prohibited by this Section.17    Any ambiguity shall be resolved against inclusion of the 18charge.19    (j) If the owner redeems a property after the county has 20obtained and recorded a tax deed under Section 21-191, the 21county may recover only actual documented out-of-pocket 22maintenance costs incurred during the county's period of 23title, and may recover those costs only if those costs are 24expressly permitted by this Code. Those maintenance costs:25        (1) shall be separately itemized;26        (2) shall be limited to actual documented out of   HB0799 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1    pocket amounts paid to third parties or actual material 2    costs paid by the county;3        (3) shall not include internal labor, staff time, 4    fringe benefits, pension costs, supervision, overhead, 5    administrative allocation, financing charges, profit, 6    markup, or any indirect cost; and7        (4) shall be subject to court review for 8    reasonableness upon objection by the redeeming owner.9    (k) If the owner does not redeem the property, no 10maintenance cost, administrative cost, overhead cost, or other 11county cost shall be charged to the former owner and no such 12cost shall be included in the tax deed judgment amount, 13minimum bid, or deducted from any surplus proceeds otherwise 14payable to the former owner or other lawful claimant.15    (l) Any contractual provision, local practice, 16administrative policy, court filing, or bid term inconsistent 17with this Section is void and unenforceable to the extent of 18the inconsistency. 19    (35 ILCS 200/1-71 new)20    Sec. 1-71. Homestead exemption property. "Homestead 21exemption property" means residential property located in a 22county with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants for which a 23homestead exemption under this Code based upon owner occupancy 24has been allowed for the taxable year in which the annual tax 25sale is held. "Homestead exemption property" does not include   HB0799 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1mixed use property, commercial property, or industrial 2property. 3    (35 ILCS 200/1-72 new)4    Sec. 1-72. Interested party. "Interested party" means any 5party having an interest in the property as revealed by a title 6examination of public records. "Interested party" does not 7include the holder of the benefit or burden of any easement 8whose interest is properly recorded and remains unaffected by 9property tax enforcement proceedings. 10    (35 ILCS 200/1-153 new)11    Sec. 1-153. Tax sale and judicial tax deed auction.12    (a) "Tax sale" means the transfer of a property tax lien or 13tax certificate in accordance with Section 21-90, 21-145, 1421-205, 21-225, 21-250, or 21-260 of this Code.15    (b) "Judicial tax deed auction" means the transfer of 16property by a public auction conducted in accordance with 17Sections 22-40 and 22-42 of this Code for the purpose of 18determining fair market value before final disposition by tax 19deed and preserving any surplus proceeds for lawful claimants. 20    (35 ILCS 200/21-90)21    Sec. 21-90. Purchase and sale by county; distribution of 22proceeds. 23    (a) When any property is offered for sale under any of the   HB0799 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1provisions of this Code, the county board of the county in 2which the property is located, in its discretion, may bid, or, 3in the case of forfeited property, may apply to purchase it or 4otherwise acquire the tax lien or certificate in the name of 5the county as trustee for all taxing districts having an 6interest in the property's taxes or special assessments for 7the nonpayment of which the property is sold. The presiding 8officer of the county board, with the advice and consent of the 9board, may appoint on its behalf some officer, person, or 10entity to attend such sales, bid on tax liens or certificates, 11and act on behalf of the county when exercising its authority 12under this Section. The county shall apply on the bid or 13purchase the unpaid taxes and special assessments due upon the 14property. No cash need be paid. 15    (b) The county, as trustee for all taxing districts having 16an interest in the property's taxes or special assessments, 17shall be the designated holder of all tax liens or 18certificates that are forfeited to the State or county or 19otherwise acquired by the county pursuant to subsection (a) of 20this Section or Sections 21-190 through 21-255 of this Code. 21No cash need be paid for any the forfeited tax lien or 22certificate acquired by the county pursuant to subsection (a) 23of this Section or Sections 21-190 through 21-255 of this 24Code. 25    (c) For any tax lien or certificate acquired under 26subsection (a) or (b) of this Section, or for any property   HB0799 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1otherwise purchased or acquired by the county pursuant to 2Sections 21-190 through 21-255 of this Code, the county may 3take steps necessary to acquire or sell title to the property 4and may manage and operate the property, including, but not 5limited to, mowing of grass, removal of nuisance greenery, 6removal of garbage, waste, debris, or other materials, or the 7demolition, repair, or remediation of unsafe structures. When 8a county, or other taxing district within the county, is a 9petitioner for a tax deed, no filing fee shall be required. 10When a county or other taxing district within the county is the 11petitioner for a tax deed, one petition may be filed including 12all parcels that are tax delinquent within the county or 13taxing district, and any publication made under Section 22-20 14of this Code may combine all such parcels within a single 15notice. The notice may include the property street address as 16listed on the most recent available tax bills, if available, 17and shall list the Property Index Number of the parcels for 18informational purposes. The county, as tax creditor and as 19trustee for other tax creditors, or other taxing district 20within the county, shall not be required to allege and prove 21that all taxes and special assessments which become due and 22payable after the sale or forfeiture to the county have been 23paid nor shall the county be required to pay the subsequently 24accruing taxes or special assessments at any time. The county 25board or its designee may prohibit the county collector from 26including the property in the tax sale of one or more   HB0799 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1subsequent years. The lien of taxes and special assessments 2which become due and payable after a tax sale to a county shall 3merge in the fee title of the county, or other taxing district 4within the county, on the issuance of a deed.5    The county may sell any property acquired with authority 6provided in this Section, or assign any tax certificate to any 7party, including, but not limited to, taxing districts, 8municipalities, land banks created pursuant to Illinois law, 9or nonprofit non-profit developers focused on constructing 10affordable housing. 11    The assigned tax certificate shall be void with no further 12rights given to the assignee, including no right to refund or 13reimbursement, if a tax deed resulting from a judicial tax 14deed auction has not been recorded within 4 years after the 15date of the assignment unless a court extends the assignment 16period as provided in this Section. Upon a motion by the 17assignee, a court may toll the 4-year deadline for a specified 18period of time if the court finds the assignee is prevented 19from obtaining or recording a deed by injunction or order of 20any court, by the refusal or inability of any court to act upon 21the application for a tax deed, by a municipality's refusal to 22issue necessary transfer stamps or approvals for recording, or 23by the refusal of the clerk to execute the deed. If an assigned 24tax certificate is void under this Section, it shall be 25forfeited to the county and held as a valid certificate of sale 26in the county's name pursuant to this Section 21-90. The   HB0799 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1proceeds of any sale or assignment under this Section, less 2all costs permitted by this Code of the county incurred in the 3acquisition, operation, maintenance, and less any surplus 4payments sale of the property or assignment of the tax 5certificate, including all costs associated with county staff 6and overhead used to owners perform the duties of the trustee 7set forth in this Section, shall be distributed to the taxing 8districts in proportion to their respective interests therein.9    Under Sections 21-110, 21-115, 21-120, and 21-190, a 10county may bid or purchase only in the absence of other bidders 11except as expressly authorized by Section 21-191.12    (d) The county, as trustee, may elect to acquire or sell 13tax delinquent property under this Section and under Sections 1422-10, 22-40, and 22-42 of this Code only as expressly 15authorized by this Code.16    (e) Nothing in this Section authorizes the inclusion of 17prohibited costs described in Section 1-4 in the redemption 18amount, tax deed judgment amount, minimum bid, or deduction 19from surplus proceeds. 20(Source: P.A. 102-363, eff. 1-1-22; 103-555, eff. 1-1-24.) 21    (35 ILCS 200/21-110)22    Sec. 21-110. Published notice of annual application for 23judgment and sale; delinquent taxes. At any time after all 24taxes have become delinquent in any year, the Collector shall 25publish an advertisement, giving notice of the intended   HB0799 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1application for judgment and tax sale of the delinquent 2properties. The advertisement may include the street address 3on file with the county collector, if available, and shall 4include the PIN number of each delinquent property. If the 5county has provided notice to the Collector of its intent to 6acquire property offered at an annual tax sale in the manner 7described in Section 21-191, the advertisement shall indicate 8which properties the county intends to acquire next to the PIN 9number and address, if any, listed in the advertisement. 10Except as provided below, the advertisement shall be in a 11newspaper published in the township or road district in which 12the properties are located. If there is no newspaper published 13in the township or road district, then the notice shall be 14published in some newspaper in the same county as the township 15or road district, to be selected by the county collector. When 16the property is in a city with more than 1,000,000 17inhabitants, the advertisement may be in any newspaper 18published in the same county. When the property is in an 19incorporated town which has superseded a civil township, the 20advertisement shall be in a newspaper published in the 21incorporated town or if there is no such newspaper, then in a 22newspaper published in the county.23    The provisions of this Section relating to the time when 24the Collector shall advertise intended application for 25judgment for sale are subject to modification by the governing 26authority of a county in accordance with the provisions of   HB0799 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1subsection (c) of Section 21-40.2(Source: P.A. 97-557, eff. 7-1-12.) 3    (35 ILCS 200/21-115)4    Sec. 21-115. Times of publication of notice. The 5advertisement shall be published once at least 10 days before 6the day on which judgment is to be applied for, and shall 7contain a list of the delinquent properties upon which the 8taxes or any part thereof remain due and unpaid, the names of 9owners, if known, the total amount due, and the year or years 10for which they are due, and whether the county intends to 11purchase the property in accordance with Section 21-191 if a 12judgment is entered against the property. In counties of less 13than 3,000,000 inhabitants, advertisement shall include notice 14of the registration requirement for persons bidding at the 15sale. Properties upon which taxes have been paid in full under 16protest shall not be included in the list.17    The collector shall give notice that he or she will apply 18to the circuit court on a specified day for judgment against 19the properties for the taxes, and costs, and for an order to 20sell the properties for the satisfaction of the amount due.21    The collector shall also give notice of a date within the 22next 5 business days after the date of application on which all 23the properties for the sale of which an order is made will 24either be sold to the county in accordance with Section 21-191 25or be exposed to public tax sale at a location within the   HB0799 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1county designated by the county collector, for the amount of 2taxes, and cost due. The advertisement published according to 3the provisions of this Section shall be deemed to be 4sufficient notice of the intended application for judgment and 5of the sale of properties under the order of the court. A 6county with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants may, by joint 7agreement, combine its tax sale with the tax sale of one or 8more other contiguous counties; such a joint tax sale shall be 9held at a location in one of the participating counties. 10Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section and Section 1121-110, in the 10 years following the completion of a general 12reassessment of property in any county with 3,000,000 or more 13inhabitants, made under an order of the Department, the 14publication shall be made not sooner than 10 days nor more than 1590 days after the date when all unpaid taxes on property have 16become delinquent. 17(Source: P.A. 101-379, eff. 1-1-20.) 18    (35 ILCS 200/21-190)19    Sec. 21-190. Entry of judgment for tax sale. 20    (a) If judgment is rendered against any property for any 21tax or, in counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, for 22any tax or special assessment, the county collector shall, 23after publishing a notice for sale in compliance with the 24requirements of Sections 21-110, and 21-115, or 21-120, 25proceed to offer the property for sale pursuant to the   HB0799 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1judgment. However, in the case of an appeal from the judgment, 2if the party, when filing notice of appeal deposits with the 3county collector the amount of the judgment and costs, the 4collector shall not sell the property until the appeal is 5disposed of.6    (b) In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, any 7property that is identified on the list published under 8Section 21-191 and that is lawfully acquired by the county 9under that Section shall not be exposed to private bidding at 10that annual sale.11    (c) All properties not acquired under subsection (b) shall 12be offered to the private market in the manner otherwise 13provided by this Code. 14(Source: P.A. 79-451; 88-455.) 15    (35 ILCS 200/21-191 new)16    Sec. 21-191. Pilot program for acquisition of tax 17certificates in counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants.18    (a) In a county with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the 19county board may elect, by ordinance or resolution, to 20participate in a pilot program under this Section.21    (b) A county that elects to participate in the pilot 22program may acquire, as trustee under Section 21-90, tax 23certificates for up to 200 properties offered at any of its 24annual tax sales, but in no event may the number of properties 25acquired under this Section exceed 50% of the total number of   HB0799 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1properties offered at that annual tax sale.2    (c) Only homestead exemption properties located within the 3electing county may be included in the pilot program under 4this Section. No delinquency amount, hardship determination, 5geographic priority, or other further screening criterion 6shall be required.7    (d) Not less than 30 days prior to the annual tax sale, the 8county shall publish on its website and deliver to the county 9clerk a list of the properties proposed for acquisition under 10this Section. The list shall identify each parcel by permanent 11index number and commonly known property address, if 12available, and shall state that the parcel is proposed for 13acquisition under this Section.14    (e) If a county acquires a tax certificate under this 15Section and thereafter obtains an order directing issuance of 16a tax deed, the county shall record the tax deed within 30 days 17after entry of the order directing issuance of tax deed.18    (f) If a county acquires a tax certificate under this 19Section and thereafter records a tax deed for the property, 20the owner shall have an automatic statutory right to redeem 21the property for a period of 365 days after recording of the 22tax deed.23    (g) If the property is not redeemed within the 365-day 24period described in subsection (f), the county shall, within 2530 days after expiration of that 365-day period, cause the 26property to be offered at judicial tax deed auction in   HB0799 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1accordance with Sections 22-40 and 22-42.2    (h) All records, lists, reports, data compilations, and 3supporting materials concerning the pilot program established 4under this Section are public records subject to the Freedom 5of Information Act, except to the extent otherwise exempt 6under that Act.7    (i) If a county acquires a tax certificate under this 8Section and thereafter obtains a tax deed for the property, 9the county shall be responsible, during the period the county 10holds title prior to redemption or judicial tax deed auction, 11for reasonable maintenance necessary to secure, preserve, and 12prevent waste or nuisance conditions at the property, as 13defined in Section 1-4. In procuring goods or services under 14this subsection, the county shall comply with all otherwise 15applicable county ordinances, policies, and goals governing 16contracting, procurement, and participation by minority-owned, 17women-owned, veteran-owned, and other protected or preferred 18business enterprises. The county shall not recover any such 19maintenance cost from the former owner except in the event of 20redemption as expressly provided in subsection (j) of Section 211-4, and no such cost shall be included in the tax deed 22judgment amount, minimum bid, or deducted from any surplus 23proceeds.24    (j) If a county records a tax deed for property under this 25Section, the county shall, within 14 days after recording the 26deed:  HB0799 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1        (1) provide written notice by certified mail to the 2    municipality in which the property is located, or to the 3    county if the property is located in an unincorporated 4    area, stating (i) that the county has acquired title, (ii) 5    the property address, if available, (iii) the permanent 6    index number, and (iv) the county office or department 7    responsible for the property; provided, however, that 8    notice may be provided by electronic mail only if the 9    municipality has previously notified the county in 10    writing, through the chief legal officer of the 11    municipality or an attorney authorized to bind the 12    municipality, that the municipality will accept the notice 13    by electronic mail and has designated a specific 14    electronic mail address for receipt of such notices; and15        (2) if the property is vacant or apparently 16    unoccupied, post a notice on the property, in a form 17    reasonably visible from the exterior, stating that the 18    property is owned by the county pursuant to tax deed and 19    providing contact information for the county office or 20    department responsible for maintenance, redemption 21    inquiries, and the status of the property.22    (k) Failure to maintain a posted notice due to removal, 23vandalism, weather, or conditions beyond the county's control 24shall not impair title, but the county shall make reasonable 25efforts to repost the notice upon learning of its removal.26    (l) This Section is repealed on July 1, 2030.   HB0799 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1    (35 ILCS 200/21-192 new)2    Sec. 21-192. Pilot program report.3    (a) A county participating in the pilot program under 4Section 21-191 shall submit an annual report to the General 5Assembly and the Department of Revenue no later than the third 6Wednesday of February of each year during the pilot period.7    (b) The report shall include, at a minimum:8        (1) the number of properties acquired under the pilot 9    program;10        (2) the number of properties offered to the private 11    market at the annual tax sale;12        (3) the number of pilot properties redeemed;13        (4) the number of pilot properties for which tax deeds 14    were issued;15        (5) the number of pilot properties offered at judicial 16    tax deed auction;17        (6) the amount of surplus proceeds returned to owners 18    or other lawful claimants;19        (7) the amount remitted to taxing districts;20        (8) the administrative costs associated with the pilot 21    program; and22        (9) any additional information the county elects to 23    provide.24    (c) All data and supporting materials underlying the 25report are public records subject to the Freedom of   HB0799 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1Information Act, except to the extent otherwise exempt under 2that Act. 3    (35 ILCS 200/21-205)4    Sec. 21-205. Tax sale procedures. 5    (a) The collector, in person or by deputy, shall attend, 6on the day and in the place specified in the notice for the 7sale of property for taxes, and shall, between 9:00 a.m. and 84:00 p.m., or later at the collector's discretion, proceed to 9offer for sale, separately and in consecutive order, all 10property in the list on which the taxes, special assessments, 11interest or costs have not been paid. However, in any county 12with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the offer for sale shall 13be made between 8:00 a.m. and 8:00 p.m. The collector's office 14shall be kept open during all hours in which the sale is in 15progress. The tax sale shall be continued from day to day, 16until all property in the delinquent list has been offered for 17sale. However, any city, village or incorporated town 18interested in the collection of any tax or special assessment, 19may, in default of bidders, withdraw from collection the 20special assessment levied against any property by the 21corporate authorities of the city, village or incorporated 22town. In case of a withdrawal, there shall be no sale of that 23property on account of the delinquent special assessment 24thereon.25    (b) Until January 1, 2013, in every tax sale of property   HB0799 Engrossed- 22 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1pursuant to the provisions of this Code, the collector may 2employ any automated means that the collector deems 3appropriate. Beginning on January 1, 2013, either (i) the 4collector shall employ an automated bidding system that is 5programmed to accept the lowest redemption price bid by an 6eligible tax purchaser, subject to the penalty percentage 7limitation set forth in Section 21-215, or (ii) all tax sales 8shall be digitally recorded with video and audio. All bidders 9are required to personally attend the tax sale and, if 10automated means are used, all hardware and software used with 11respect to those automated means must be certified by the 12Department and re-certified by the Department every 5 years. 13If the tax sales are digitally recorded and no automated 14bidding system is used, then the recordings shall be 15maintained by the collector for a period of at least 3 years 16from the date of the tax sale. The changes made by this 17amendatory Act of the 94th General Assembly are declarative of 18existing law. 19    (b-5) For any annual tax sale conducted on or after the 20effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 21Assembly, each county collector in a county with 275,000 or 22more inhabitants shall adopt a single bidder rule sufficient 23to prohibit a tax purchaser from registering more than one 24related bidding entity at the tax sale. The corporate 25authorities in any county with less than 275,000 inhabitants 26may, by ordinance, allow the county collector of that county   HB0799 Engrossed- 23 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1to adopt such a single bidder rule. In any county that has 2adopted a single bidder rule under this subsection (b-5), the 3county treasurer shall include a representation and warranty 4form in each registration package attesting to compliance with 5the single bidder rule, except that the county may, by 6ordinance, opt out of this representation and warranty form 7requirement. A single bidder rule under this subsection may be 8in the following form: 9        (1) A registered tax buying entity (principal) may 10    only have one registered buyer at the tax sale and may not 11    have a related bidding entity directly or indirectly 12    register as a buyer or participate in the tax sale. A 13    registered tax buying entity may not engage in any 14    multiple bidding strategy for the purpose of having more 15    than one related bidding entity submit bids at the tax 16    sale. 17        (2) A related bidding entity is defined as any 18    individual, corporation, partnership, joint venture, 19    limited liability company, business organization, or other 20    entity that has a shareholder, partner, principal, 21    officer, general partner, or other person or entity having 22    (i) an ownership interest in a bidding entity in common 23    with any other registered participant in the tax sale or 24    (ii) a common guarantor in connection with a source of 25    financing with any other registered participant in the tax 26    sale. The determination of whether registered entities are   HB0799 Engrossed- 24 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1    related so as to prohibit those entities from submitting 2    duplicate bids in violation of the single bidder rule is 3    at the sole and exclusive discretion of the county 4    treasurer or his or her designated representatives. 5    (c) County collectors may, when applicable, eject tax 6bidders who disrupt the tax sale or use illegal bid practices.7    (d) No bidder, principal, affiliate, nominee, or related 8entity shall directly or indirectly engage in collusive 9bidding, common-control bidding, nominee bidding, bid 10rotation, or any other scheme designed to suppress competition 11at any tax sale under this Code. A violation of this subsection 12may result in disqualification, cancellation of bids, 13suspension from future sales, civil penalties, and referral to 14the Attorney General or other appropriate enforcement 15authority.16    (e) Any property to be acquired by a county in the manner 17described in Section 21-191 shall not be offered for sale in 18the manner detailed in subsections (a) through (d) of this 19Section. Instead, all such property shall be sold to the 20county for the total amount due on the day of the scheduled tax 21sale in whatever manner is deemed most expedient and efficient 22by the collector's office. For any properties acquired by the 23county as described in Section 21-191 that are subsequently 24sold at a judicial tax deed auction in accordance with this 25Code, any amounts generated in cash from such auction shall be 26distributed in the manner described in this Code.   HB0799 Engrossed- 25 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1(Source: P.A. 102-519, eff. 8-20-21.) 2    (35 ILCS 200/21-215)3    Sec. 21-215. Penalty bids. 4    (a) Subject to subsection (b) of this Section, the The 5person at the sale offering to pay the amount due on each 6property for the least penalty percentage shall be the 7purchaser of that property. No bid shall be accepted for a 8penalty exceeding 9% of the amount of the tax or special 9assessment on property.10    (b) If the county offers to purchase property for the 11amount due in accordance with Section 21-191, the county shall 12be the purchaser of the property notwithstanding any other 13offer. Subject to a payment plan implemented by the county 14clerk in accordance with subsection (d) of Section 21-385, the 15penalty for any property purchased by the county in this 16manner shall be 9% of the amount of the tax or special 17assessment on property. 18(Source: P.A. 102-363, eff. 1-1-22.) 19    (35 ILCS 200/21-225)20    Sec. 21-225. Forfeited tax liens and certificates. Every 21tax lien or certificate for property offered at public tax 22sale, and not sold for want of bidders, unless it is released 23from tax sale by the withdrawal from collection of a special 24assessment levied thereon, shall be forfeited to the county,   HB0799 Engrossed- 26 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1as trustee for the taxing districts, and managed pursuant to 2Section 21-90. Tax certificates are also forfeited to the 3county in those circumstances described in subsection (d) of 4Section 21-310 and subsection (f) of Section 22-40 of this 5Code.6(Source: P.A. 103-555, eff. 1-1-24.) 7    (35 ILCS 200/21-250)8    Sec. 21-250. Certificate of purchase. 9    (a) The county clerk shall make out and deliver to the 10purchaser of any property sold under Section 21-205, or to the 11county if the lien is acquired pursuant to Section 21-191 or 12Section 21-90 and a certificate is requested by the county or 13its agent, a tax certificate countersigned by the collector, 14describing the property sold, the date of sale, the amount of 15taxes, special assessments, interest, and cost for which they 16were sold, and stating that payment of the sale price has been 17made. 18    (b) A certificate of purchase shall not be assigned unless 19the assignment is registered in accordance with Section 2021-251. and cost for which they were sold and that payment of 21the sale price has been made. If any person becomes the 22purchaser of more than one property owned by one party or 23person, the purchaser may have the whole or one or more of them 24included in one certificate, but separate certificates shall 25be issued in all other cases. A tax certificate shall be   HB0799 Engrossed- 27 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1assignable by endorsement. An assignment shall vest in the 2assignee or his or her legal representatives, all the right 3and title of the original purchaser.4    If the tax certificate is lost or destroyed, the county 5clerk shall issue a duplicate certificate upon written request 6and a sworn affidavit by the tax sale purchaser, or his or her 7assignee, that the tax certificate is lost or destroyed. The 8county clerk shall cause a notation to be made in the tax sale 9and judgment book that a duplicate certificate has been 10issued, and redemption payments shall be made only to the 11holder of the duplicate certificate.12(Source: P.A. 103-555, eff. 1-1-24.) 13    (35 ILCS 200/21-251 new)14    Sec. 21-251. Registry of owners and assignees of 15certificates of purchase.16    (a) The county clerk shall create and maintain a registry 17recording the names, business addresses, telephone numbers, 18and beneficial ownership information of owners and assignees 19of certificates of purchase. The registry may be maintained in 20paper or electronic form and shall be accessible to the 21public.22    (b) Every assignment of a certificate of purchase shall be 23registered with the county clerk.24    (c) No assignee shall have any right to redemption 25proceeds, refund rights, petition rights, judicial tax deed   HB0799 Engrossed- 28 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1auction rights, or tax deed rights unless the assignment is 2duly registered.3    (d) Each assignee shall disclose the identity of all 4persons or entities holding, directly or indirectly, a 5beneficial ownership interest of 5% or more in the assignee or 6in the certificate.7    (e) Any notice required in proceedings relating to a tax 8sale may be sent to the most recent registered owner listed in 9the registry.10    (f) The county clerk may adopt reasonable forms and 11procedures to administer this Section. 12    (35 ILCS 200/21-350)13    Sec. 21-350. Period of redemption. Property sold at a tax 14sale under this Code may be redeemed at any time before the 15expiration of (i) 2 years and 6 months from the date of sale in 16counties with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants and (ii) 3 2.5 17years from the date of sale in counties with 3,000,000 or more 18inhabitants, except that, in all counties: 19        (a) If on the date of sale the property is vacant 20    non-farm property or property containing an improvement 21    consisting of a structure or structures with 7 or more 22    residential units or that is commercial or industrial 23    property, it may be redeemed at any time before the 24    expiration of one 1 year from the date of the tax sale.25        (a-5) If, on the date of the tax sale, the property   HB0799 Engrossed- 29 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1    sold is occupied residential property containing a 2    structure or structures with 6 or fewer residential units, 3    the property may be redeemed after 3 years but before the 4    court orders the property sold at a judicial tax deed 5    auction. 6        (b) (Blank). 7        (c) If the period of redemption has been extended by 8    the certificate holder as provided in Section 21-385 or 9    Section 22-5, the property may be redeemed on or before 10    the extended redemption date. The changes made to this 11    Section by this amendatory Act of the 103rd General 12    Assembly apply to matters concerning tax certificates 13    issued on or after January 1, 2024. 14        (d) If a county acquires a tax certificate under 15    Section 21-191 and thereafter records a tax deed for the 16    property, the owner may redeem during the 365-day period 17    described in subsection (f) of Section 21-191.18(Source: P.A. 103-555, eff. 1-1-24.) 19    (35 ILCS 200/21-390)20    Sec. 21-390. Effect of receipt of redemption money, 21forfeiture, withdrawal or return of certificate. The receipt 22of the redemption money on any property by any purchaser or 23assignee, on account of any forfeiture or withdrawal, or the 24return of the certificate of purchase, withdrawal, or 25forfeiture or forfeiture for cancellation, shall operate as a   HB0799 Engrossed- 30 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1release of the claim to the property under, or by virtue of, 2the purchase, withdrawal or forfeiture. However, when a 3certificate of purchase has been recorded in the office of the 4county recorder by any city, incorporated town or village with 51,000,000 or more inhabitants in which the property is 6situated, the recording of a certificate by the County Clerk, 7reciting the cancellation of the certificate of purchase on 8the tax judgment, sale, redemption and forfeiture record, 9shall operate as a release of the lien of the city, 10incorporated town, or village under the certificate of 11purchase.12    The county clerk shall pay redemption proceeds to the 13registered certificate holder within 60 days after receipt of 14the collected redemption funds and the surrender or electronic 15cancellation of the certificate. Any disbursement not made 16within that period shall accrue interest at the statutory rate 17until paid. 18(Source: P.A. 83-358; 88-455.) 19    (35 ILCS 200/22-5)20    Sec. 22-5. Notice of sale and redemption rights. In order 21to be entitled to an order for a judicial tax deed auction and 22a tax deed, within 4 months and 15 days after any tax sale held 23under this Code, the purchaser or his or her assignee, and the 24county for all tax liens or forfeited certificates it acquires 25pursuant to Section 21-90 or Section 21-191 of this Code from   HB0799 Engrossed- 31 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1the annual sale, shall deliver to the county clerk a notice to 2be given to the party in whose name the taxes are last assessed 3as shown by the most recent tax collector's warrant books, in 4at least 10 point type in the following form completely filled 5in:6TAKE NOTICE7    County of ...........................................8    Date Premises Sold or Forfeited .....................9    Certificate No. .....................................10    Sold for General Taxes of (year) ....................11    Sold for Special Assessment of (Municipality)12    and special assessment number .......................13    Warrant No. ............... Inst. No. .................14THIS PROPERTY HAS BEEN SOLD AT A TAX SALE FOR15DELINQUENT TAXES16Property Address (as identified on the most recent tax bill, 17if available) ....18Legal Description or Property Index No. ..........19..........20..............................21    This notice is to advise you that, if you do not redeem by 22paying your tax debt before the deadline, a petition may be 23filed in court for a judicial tax deed auction and for a tax 24deed which will transfer title and the right to possession of 25the above-referenced property. If you are a homeowner, this 26may eventually result in eviction from your home ("Property")   HB0799 Engrossed- 32 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1if redemption is not made on or before the redemption 2deadline.3    Your right to redeem will expire on .....................4    To determine the redemption deadline and the total amount 5you must pay to redeem the sold taxes, you must immediately 6contact the County Clerk at the address, phone number, or 7email address below. Check with the County Clerk for the exact 8amount you owe before redeeming. Payment must be made by 9certified check, cashier's check, money order, or in cash to 10the County Clerk. 11YOU ARE URGED TO REDEEM IMMEDIATELY TO12PREVENT LOSS OF PROPERTY AND ADDITIONAL COSTS 13    The longer you wait, the more expensive it will be to 14redeem and prevent the loss of your property. Interest will 15continue to accrue on the total amount owed until the property 16is redeemed, and you may owe additional attorney's or filing 17fees if the certificate holder chooses to pursue an order for a 18judicial tax deed auction to compel the sale or transfer of the 19deed to the property. 20    Property sold under the Property Tax Code may be redeemed 21by any owner or person holding an interest in the Property at 22any time before the following deadlines (based on property 23classification as of the Date of Sale): 24    You must redeem your taxes within one year of the Date of 25Sale for the following classifications: 26        (1) vacant non-farm property;  HB0799 Engrossed- 33 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1        (2) property containing an improvement consisting of a 2    structure or structures with 7 or more residential units; 3    and4        (3) commercial or industrial property. 5    You must redeem your taxes within 2 1/2 years and 6 months 6of the Date of Sale for the following classifications: 7        (1) all residential property with less than 6 units; 8    and9        (2) all other property not otherwise subject to a 10    longer covered by the 1-year redemption period under 11    Illinois law outlined above.12    In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, occupied 13residential property containing a structure or structures with 146 or fewer residential units may be redeemed within 3 years of 15the Date of Sale and before the court orders the property sold 16at judicial tax deed auction.17    If the property is not redeemed and is later sold at 18judicial tax deed auction, the owner may be entitled to any 19surplus proceeds remaining after payment of the lawful amount 20due and allowable costs. 21    Redemption deadlines may have been extended by the 22certificate holder or pursuant to Illinois law. To confirm the 23redemption deadline and amount needed to redeem, you must 24contact the County Clerk at the address, telephone number, or 25email address below. Redemption can be made at any time on or 26before .... by applying to the County Clerk of .... County,   HB0799 Engrossed- 34 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1Illinois at the Office of the County Clerk in ...., Illinois. 2The address, telephone number, and email address for the 3County Clerk is as follows: 4ADDRESS:............................ 5TELEPHONE AND/OR EMAIL ADDRESS:.......................... 6    For further information about the redemption deadline, 7redemption amount, or payment process, please contact the 8County Clerk.9    Housing Counselor Information: If you would like housing 10counseling or assistance, you can contact the U.S. Department 11of Housing and Urban Development for a list of homeownership 12counselors or counseling organizations in your area.13    In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the 14redemption notice shall contain a provision in Spanish, 15Polish, and Mandarin Chinese stating that the redemption 16notice affects important legal rights and should be translated 17immediately.   18    Within 10 days after receipt of said notice, the county 19clerk shall mail to the addresses supplied by the purchaser or 20assignee, by registered or certified mail, copies of said 21notice to the party in whose name the taxes are last assessed 22as shown by the most recent tax collector's warrant books. 23With the exception of a county or taxing district acquiring 24certificates pursuant to Section 21-90 or Section 21-191 and   HB0799 Engrossed- 35 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b121-260, all purchasers or assignees shall pay to the clerk 2postage plus the sum of $10. The clerk shall write or stamp the 3date of receiving the notices upon the copies of the notices, 4and retain one copy.5    All With the exception of forfeited tax liens or 6certificates held by the county pursuant to Section 21-90, all 7redemption periods shall begin on the date of the tax sale. For 8forfeited tax liens or certificates held by the county 9pursuant to Section 21-90, the county may cure any defect in a 10notice, or failure to send a notice as required by this 11Section, by delivering to the county clerk a notice to be given 12to the party in whose name the taxes are last assessed as shown 13by the most recent tax collector's warrant books. The 14redemption period begins on the date the county delivered the 15corrected notice to the clerk, if such extension is otherwise 16permitted by law. 17    The changes to this Section made by this amendatory Act of 18the 97th General Assembly apply only to tax sales that occur on 19or after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 97th 20General Assembly.21    The changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of 22the 103rd General Assembly apply to matters concerning tax 23certificates issued on or after the effective date of this 24amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly. 25(Source: P.A. 102-815, eff. 5-13-22; 103-555, eff. 1-1-24.)   HB0799 Engrossed- 36 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1    (35 ILCS 200/22-10)2    Sec. 22-10. Notice of expiration of period of redemption. 3A purchaser or assignee shall not be entitled to request an 4order for a judicial tax deed auction and a tax deed to the 5property sold at an annual tax sale unless, not less than 3 6months nor more than 6 months prior to the expiration of the 7period of redemption, he or she gives notice of the sale as 8provided below and the date of expiration of the period of 9redemption to the owners, occupants, and interested parties 10and parties interested in the property, including any 11mortgagee of record, as well as the municipality in which the 12subject property lies, or the county if the property lies 13outside municipal corporate boundaries as provided below. For 14counties or taxing districts holding certificates pursuant to 15Section 21-90 or Section 21-191, the date of expiration of the 16period of redemption shall be designated by the county or 17taxing district in its petition for tax deed and identified in 18the notice below, which shall be filed with the county clerk.19    The Notice to be given to the parties shall be in at least 2010-point type in the following form completely filled in:21TAX DEED NO. .................... FILED ....................22TAKE NOTICE23    County of ...........................................24    Date Premises Sold or Forfeited .....................25    Certificate No. .....................................26    Sold or Forfeited for General Taxes of (year) .......  HB0799 Engrossed- 37 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1    Sold for Special Assessment of (Municipality)2    and special assessment number .......................3    Warrant No. ................ Inst. No. .................4THIS PROPERTY HAS BEEN SOLD AT A TAX SALE FOR5DELINQUENT TAXES6Property Address (as identified on the most recent tax bill, 7if available) ....8Legal Description or Property Index No. ..........9..........10..............................11    This notice is to advise you that the above property has 12been sold for delinquent taxes at a tax sale and that the 13period of redemption from the sale will expire on ......14......15    Check with the county clerk as to the exact amount you owe 16before redeeming.17    This notice is also to advise you that a petition has been 18filed in the Circuit Court seeking an order for judicial tax 19deed auction and for a tax deed which will transfer title and 20the right to possession of this property if redemption is not 21made on or before .......................................22    If you are a homeowner, this may eventually result in 23eviction from your home. 24    This matter is set for hearing in the Circuit Court of this 25county in ...., Illinois on .....26    You may be present at this hearing but your right to redeem   HB0799 Engrossed- 38 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1may will already have expired at that time unless Illinois law 2provides an additional redemption period. You may file a 3response to the petition or attend the hearing and present 4your case to the court. However, if you do not redeem at or 5before the hearing, and if the court finds that the petitioner 6has complied with all notice and other proper steps required 7to seek an order for judicial tax deed auction, the court may 8enter an order that your right to redeem has expired, all other 9interested parties have been provided proper notice and their 10interests have been resolved or extinguished, and the deed to 11the property is to be offered for sale at a public auction.12    If you are the current owner of the property, you may be 13entitled to receive any surplus from the judicial tax deed 14auction after the delinquent taxes and allowable costs are 15paid. If there is a surplus, you will receive notice about how 16to claim the funds.17    If the property is subject to Section 21-191 of the 18Property Tax Code and the county thereafter records a tax 19deed, you shall have an automatic statutory right to redeem 20the property for a period of 365 days after recording of the 21tax deed. 22YOU ARE URGED TO REDEEM IMMEDIATELY23TO PREVENT LOSS OF PROPERTY AND ADDITIONAL COSTS 24    Redemption can be made at any time on or before .... by 25applying to the County Clerk of ...., County, Illinois at the 26Office of the County Clerk in ...., Illinois.  HB0799 Engrossed- 39 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1    For further information contact the County Clerk2ADDRESS:.................... 3TELEPHONE AND/OR EMAIL ADDRESS:..................  4..........................5Purchaser or Assignee. 6Dated (insert date).  7    Housing Counselor Information: If you would like housing 8counseling or assistance, you can contact the U.S. Department 9of Housing and Urban Development for a list of homeownership 10counselors or counseling organizations in your area.11    In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the notice 12shall contain a provision in Spanish, Polish, and Mandarin 13Chinese stating that the notice affects important legal rights 14and should be translated immediately. In counties with 153,000,000 or more inhabitants, the notice shall also state the 16address, room number, and time at which the matter is set for 17hearing.18    The changes to this Section made by Public Act 97-557 19apply only to matters in which a petition for tax deed is filed 20on or after July 1, 2012 (the effective date of Public Act 2197-557). 22    The changes to this Section made by Public Act 102-1003 23apply to matters in which a petition for tax deed is filed on 24or after May 27, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act   HB0799 Engrossed- 40 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1102-1003). Failure of any party or any public official to 2comply with the changes made to this Section by Public Act 3102-528 does not invalidate any tax deed issued prior to May 427, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1003). 5    The changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of 6the 103rd General Assembly apply to matters concerning tax 7certificates issued on or after the effective date of this 8amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly. 9(Source: P.A. 102-528, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 10102-1003, eff. 5-27-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-555, eff. 111-1-24.) 12    (35 ILCS 200/22-40)13    Sec. 22-40. Issuance of order authorizing judicial tax 14deed auction, confirmation and order for tax deed; possession. 15    (a) To obtain an order authorizing a judicial tax deed 16auction and for issuance of tax deed, the petitioner must 17provide sufficient evidence that:18        (1) the redemption period has expired and the property 19    has not been redeemed; 20        (2) all taxes and special assessments which became due 21    and payable subsequent to the sale have been paid, unless 22    the county or its agent, as trustee pursuant to Section 23    21-90 or Section 21-191, is the petitioner; 24        (3) all forfeitures and sales which occur subsequent 25    to the sale are paid or redeemed, unless the county or its   HB0799 Engrossed- 41 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1    agent, as trustee pursuant to Section 21-90 or Section 2    21-191, is the petitioner; 3        (4) the notices required by law have been given, and 4    all advancements of public funds under the police power 5    made by a county, city, village, or town under Section 6    22-35 have been paid; and 7        (5) the petitioner has complied with all the 8    provisions of law entitling him or her to a deed. 9    Upon receipt of sufficient evidence of the requirements 10under this subsection (a), the court shall find that the 11petitioner complied with those requirements and shall enter an 12order authorizing a judicial tax deed auction or an order 13authorizing issuance of a tax deed to a county trustee 14pursuant to Section 21-90 or Section 21-191, subject to the 15requirements of this Section, directing the county clerk, on 16the production of the tax certificate and a certified copy of 17the order, to issue to the purchaser or its assignee a tax 18deed. The court shall insist on strict compliance with 19Sections Section 22-10 through 22-25. Prior to the entry of an 20order under this Section directing the issuance of a tax deed, 21the petitioner shall furnish the court with a report of 22proceedings of the evidence received on the application for 23tax deed and the report of proceedings shall be filed and made 24a part of the court record. The petitioner shall also furnish 25to the court a statement of redemption from the county clerk 26showing the total taxes, penalties, and costs that were   HB0799 Engrossed- 42 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1required to be paid to redeem the tax sale as specified in the 2notice required under Section 22-10. The petitioner for tax 3deed must file a statement of, if applicable, (i) all taxes it 4has paid or redeemed for the property, (ii) the costs paid for 5court reporter and transcript services in counties of 63,000,000 or more inhabitants, or, in counties with less than 73,000,000 inhabitants, a submission of a report of proceedings 8to the court, (iii) the fees paid to the clerk for the estimate 9of redemption, (iv) all payments made for municipal 10advancements required by Section 22-35, and (v) costs 11expressly permitted by this Code. The total of the amount 12shown on the statement of redemption plus items (i) through 13(v), or portion thereof, shall be identified as the tax deed 14judgment amount. For certificates issued on or after July 1, 152026, the tax deed judgment amount shall include only 16allowable costs as defined in Section 1-4. No prohibited cost 17under Section 1-4 may be included for any purpose.18    The purpose of the judicial tax deed auction shall be to 19test the fair market value of the property before final 20disposition by tax deed and to preserve any surplus proceeds 21for lawful claimants.22    If the petitioner is a county proceeding under Section 2321-191 and a tax deed is issued to the county prior to auction, 24the property shall nevertheless be offered at a judicial tax 25deed auction within the time required by Section 21-191 if the 26property is not redeemed.  HB0799 Engrossed- 43 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1    No minimum bid shall include any fee, surcharge, or charge 2imposed primarily to capitalize an indemnity fund, surplus 3account, automation fund, registry, general revenue account, 4or other governmental account.5    The order for judicial tax deed auction shall include such 6terms and conditions of the auction as specified by the court 7and the report of proceedings shall be filed and made a part of 8the court record. 9    (b) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this Section, 10if taxes for years prior to the year or years sold are or 11become delinquent subsequent to the date of sale, the court 12shall find that the lien of those delinquent taxes has been or 13will be merged into the tax deed grantee's title if the court 14determines that the tax deed grantee or any prior holder of the 15certificate of purchase, or any person or entity under common 16ownership or control with any such grantee or prior holder of 17the certificate of purchase, was at no time the holder of any 18certificate of purchase for the years sought to be merged. If 19delinquent taxes are merged into the tax deed pursuant to this 20subsection, the court shall enter an order declaring which 21specific taxes have been or will be merged into the tax deed 22title and directing the county treasurer and county clerk to 23reflect that declaration in the warrant and judgment records; 24provided, that no such order shall be effective until a tax 25deed has been issued and timely recorded. Nothing contained in 26this Section shall relieve any owner liable for delinquent   HB0799 Engrossed- 44 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1property taxes under this Code from the payment of the taxes 2that have been merged into the title upon issuance of the tax 3deed.4    (c) The county clerk is entitled to a fee of $10 in 5counties of 3,000,000 or more inhabitants and $5 in counties 6with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants for the issuance of the 7tax deed, with the exception of deeds issued to the county 8pursuant to its authority under Section 21-90 or Section 921-191. The clerk may not include in a tax deed more than one 10property as listed, assessed and sold in one description, 11except in cases where several properties are owned by one 12person.13    Upon application, the court shall enter an order to place 14the tax deed grantee or the grantee's successor in interest in 15possession of the property and may enter orders and grant 16relief as may be necessary or desirable to maintain the 17grantee or the grantee's successor in interest in possession.18    (d) The court shall retain jurisdiction to enter orders 19pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) of this Section. Public 20Act 92-223 and Public Act 95-477 shall be construed as being 21declarative of existing law and not as a new enactment.22    (e) Prior to the issuance of any order for a judicial tax 23deed auction under this Section, the petitioner must redeem 24all taxes and special assessments on the property that are 25delinquent after the date of its tax sale subject to a pending 26tax petition filed by a county or its assignee pursuant to   HB0799 Engrossed- 45 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1Section 21-90 or Section 21-191.2    (f) If, for any reason, a purchaser fails to obtain an 3order for judicial tax deed auction or for tax deed within the 4required time period and no sale in error was granted or 5redemption paid, then the certificate shall be forfeited to 6the county, as trustee, pursuant to Section 21-90.7    (g) Except as provided in Section 21-191, upon entry of an 8order requiring a judicial tax deed auction under subsection 9(a) of this Section, the property shall be offered for sale by 10public auction within 120 days after the date of the order and 11sold to the highest bidder at such an auction in accordance 12with Section 22-42 and subject to additional requirements set 13by the court's order.14(Source: P.A. 103-555, eff. 1-1-24; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 15    (35 ILCS 200/22-42 new)16    Sec. 22-42. Judicial tax deed auction and procedures.17    (a) Notice of tax deed auction. The sheriff or duly 18appointed private selling officer shall give notice of the 19auction with the following information:20        (1) the Property Identification Number and address 21    listed on the most recent tax bill;22        (2) the time and place of the auction including 23    whether the auction will take place online, in person, or 24    both, and the website where the online bidding may take 25    place, if applicable;  HB0799 Engrossed- 46 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1        (3) the terms of the auction; and2        (4) the amount of the tax deed judgment amount 3    provided in Section 22-40.4    The Notice of Tax Deed Auction shall be in clear and 5concise language, together with a notice in Spanish, Polish, 6and Mandarin Chinese stating that the notice affects important 7legal rights and should be translated immediately. The Notice 8of Tax Deed Auction shall be mailed via first-class mail to all 9interested parties. The Notice of Tax Deed Auction shall be 10mailed via first-class mail and certified mail to the owner of 11the property, at the address at which service of the Section 1222-10 Take Notice was attempted, and to any parties who have 13appeared in the proceeding. The notice shall include a sworn 14certificate of service signed by the party sending the notice 15attesting to the fact that the notice of auction was placed in 16the mail at least 10 calendar days prior to the date of the 17auction.18    The Notice of Tax Deed Auction shall be published in at 19least 3 consecutive calendar weeks, once in each week. The 20first such notice shall be published not more than 45 days 21prior to the auction, and the last such notice shall be 22published not less than 7 days prior to the auction. If the 23property is located in a municipality in a county with less 24than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the petitioner shall also publish 25a notice in a newspaper published in the municipality and in 26such other publications as may be further ordered by the   HB0799 Engrossed- 47 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1court. If the petitioner cannot identify a newspaper published 2in the municipality, or if the property is located in a county 3with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the notice shall be 4published in a newspaper published within the county and in 5such other publications as may be further ordered by the 6court. If no newspaper is published in the county, then the 7notice shall be published in the newspaper that is published 8nearest the county seat of the county in which the property is 9located and such other publications as may be further ordered 10by the court. The publication shall include all information 11included in the notice sent pursuant to this Section.12    (b) Minimum bid. The selling officer shall start all 13bidding with a minimum bid equal to the tax deed judgment 14amount, plus only the cost for the publication of the judicial 15sale required in this Section and the costs of the selling 16officer. The selling officer shall proceed to a public 17judicial tax deed auction, offer the real estate for sale, and 18sell the real estate to the highest bidder. The highest bid at 19the judicial tax deed auction shall constitute the fair market 20value of the property for purposes of this Code. If no bidder 21is willing to pay the minimum bid, the petitioner shall be the 22winning bidder and be entitled to a tax deed, and it shall be 23conclusively presumed that there is no surplus equity in the 24property.25    (c) Credit bid for petitioner. At the auction under this 26Section, the person conducting the auction shall enter a bid   HB0799 Engrossed- 48 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1in favor of the petitioner in the amount of the minimum bid set 2forth above. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 3prevent the petitioner from bidding at the public auction. 4However, if the petitioner is the winning bidder, the holder 5must pay cash for the difference between the winning bid and 6the minimum bid, plus any applicable costs or fees that may be 7attached to the winning bid.8    (d) Receipt upon judicial tax deed auction. Upon and at 9the conclusion of the judicial tax deed auction, the person 10conducting the auction shall give to the purchaser a receipt 11of sale. The receipt shall describe the real estate purchased 12and shall show the amount bid, the total amount paid to date, 13and the amount still to be paid therefor. An additional 14receipt shall be given at the time of each subsequent payment. 15Any purchaser who fails to complete the sale for failure to 16make full payment shall forfeit to the county any deposit 17already made, and the court shall order a new auction of the 18property.19    (e) Certificate of Judicial Tax Deed Auction. Upon payment 20in full of the amount bid, the sheriff or duly appointed 21selling officer conducting the sale shall issue, in duplicate, 22and give to the purchaser a certificate of judicial tax deed 23auction. The certificate shall be in a recordable form, 24describe the real estate purchased, indicate the date and 25place of sale and show the amount paid therefor. The 26certificate shall further indicate that it is subject to   HB0799 Engrossed- 49 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1confirmation by the court. The certificate shall be freely 2assignable by endorsement thereon.3    (f) Deposit of surplus funds. To the extent that the 4winning bid exceeds the minimum bid, upon the expiration of 30 5days following confirmation of the sale, the selling officer 6shall deposit the surplus funds with the treasurer of the 7county in which the subject property lies and provide the 8treasurer with the parties and mailing addresses to which all 9Take Notices were sent pursuant to Section 22-10.10    (g) Confirmation of sale; order for issuance of tax deed.11        (1) The sheriff or selling officer conducting the sale 12    shall promptly make a report to the court that issued the 13    order authorizing the judicial tax deed auction, which 14    report shall include a copy of all receipts and, if any, 15    certificate of judicial tax deed auction.16        (2) Upon motion and notice in accordance with court 17    rules applicable to motions generally, which motion shall 18    not be made prior to sale, the court shall conduct a 19    hearing to confirm the sale. Unless the court finds that a 20    notice required in this Section was not issued or the sale 21    was not conducted in accordance with the order for 22    judicial tax deed auction, the court shall enter an order:23            (A) confirming the judicial tax deed auction sale;24            (B) directing the county clerk to issue a tax deed 25        in the name of the holder of the certificate of 26        judicial tax deed auction once presented with a   HB0799 Engrossed- 50 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1        certified copy of the confirmation order and original 2        certificate of judicial tax deed auction; and3            (C) directing the selling officer to pay to the 4        holder of the tax certificate the amount of the credit 5        bid upon surrender of the tax certificate, and to pay 6        the selling officer its fees.7        (3) If the county is the holder of the tax certificate 8    for property sold at a judicial tax deed auction in 9    accordance with this Section, any proceeds of any such 10    sale shall be distributed to the taxing districts in 11    proportion to their respective interests therein. 12    Notwithstanding the preceding, any distribution to the 13    taxing districts shall be reduced by the costs expressly 14    authorized by this Code associated with the sale of the 15    property. Any surplus amount to be held by the county 16    treasurer and distributed to former owners in accordance 17    with this Section shall be excluded from distributions to 18    taxing districts.19        (4) If any judicial tax deed auction sale fails to 20    comply with the requirements in this Section, any party 21    may, by motion supported by affidavit made prior to 22    confirmation of such sale, request that the court which 23    entered the judgment set aside the judicial tax deed 24    auction sale. Any such party shall guarantee or secure by 25    bond a bid equal to the successful bid at the judicial tax 26    deed auction. No guarantee or bond shall be required if   HB0799 Engrossed- 51 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1    the property is residential and the party seeking to set 2    aside the sale is the owner-occupant of the property at 3    the time the motion is filed. If the court denies 4    confirmation of the judicial tax deed auction sale, it 5    shall order a new judicial tax deed auction. Any 6    subsequent auction is subject to the same notice 7    requirement as the original auction.8        (5) No sale under this Section shall be held invalid 9    or be set aside because of any immaterial or insignificant 10    defect in the notice thereof or in the publication of the 11    same, or in the proceedings of the officer conducting the 12    sale.13    (h) Notice of surplus proceeds. Within 60 days following 14the deposit of surplus funds with the treasurer of the county, 15the treasurer shall send notice to all parties to which the 16Section 22-10 Take Notice was sent, stating that the owner or 17owners of the property at the time of the sale may submit a 18claim for the surplus funds to the county treasurer or the 19circuit court within 3 years of the date on the notice.20    (i) Distribution of surplus proceeds. Upon receipt of a 21claim for surplus proceeds, the county treasurer, being 22satisfied of the facts in the case, shall distribute the 23surplus proceeds to the proper claimant. When the county 24treasurer is unable to determine the proper claimant, the 25county treasurer shall file a motion with the circuit court 26hearing the underlying tax case, requesting that the court   HB0799 Engrossed- 52 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1determine whether an interested party is the owner of record 2entitled to a disbursement of surplus proceeds. Within 30 days 3following the filing of the motion, the court hearing the 4underlying tax case shall set a hearing to determine whether 5an interested party is the owner of record entitled to a 6disbursement of surplus proceeds. All interested parties in 7the underlying case shall be notified by the county treasurer. 8Any party claiming to have an ownership interest in the parcel 9at the time of the issuance of tax deed may present evidence of 10ownership and request a disbursement of any or all surplus 11proceeds. The court shall issue an order directing the 12treasurer to disburse a specific amount of surplus proceeds to 13specific parties, with sufficient personally identifiable 14information to accurately identify the parties entitled to 15disbursement.16    (j) Disbursement hearing. Upon filing of a motion by a 17party claiming to be the owner of the property at the time of 18sale, within 30 days following the filing of the motion, the 19court hearing the underlying tax case shall set a hearing to 20determine whether an interested party is the owner entitled to 21a disbursement of surplus proceeds. All interested parties in 22the underlying case shall be notified by the movant. Any party 23claiming to be the owner of the property at the time of sale 24may present evidence of ownership and request a disbursement 25of any or all surplus proceeds. The court shall issue an order 26directing the treasurer to disburse a specific amount of   HB0799 Engrossed- 53 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1surplus proceeds to specific parties, with sufficient 2personally identifiable information to accurately identify the 3parties entitled to disbursement.4    (k) Certain deductions prohibited. No maintenance cost, 5administrative cost, overhead cost, or other prohibited cost 6under Section 1-4 shall be deducted from surplus proceeds.7    (l) Interest. Interest earned on surplus proceeds while 8held by the county treasurer shall belong to the lawful 9claimant and shall be paid with the principal amount of the 10surplus proceeds.11    (m) Disposition of unclaimed surplus funds. Surplus funds 12that have not been claimed within 3 years following the date on 13the county treasurer's notice shall be disposed of pursuant to 14the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 15    (35 ILCS 200/22-43 new)16    Sec. 22-43. Segregated escrow account for surplus 17proceeds.18    (a) All surplus proceeds deposited with the county 19treasurer under this Code shall be held in a segregated, 20non-divertible escrow account.21    (b) Moneys held in the escrow account shall not be 22transferred, appropriated, borrowed, swept, pledged, invested, 23or otherwise used for any county general fund, tort liability 24fund, county investment program, or other governmental 25purpose.  HB0799 Engrossed- 54 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1    (c) Moneys held in the escrow account shall be used solely 2for disbursement of surplus proceeds to lawful claimants as 3authorized under this Code.4    (d) The county treasurer shall maintain records of all 5deposits, balances, notices, disbursements, and transfers to 6unclaimed property.7    (e) Records under this Section are public records subject 8to the Freedom of Information Act, except to the extent 9otherwise exempt under that Act. 10    (35 ILCS 200/22-65)11    Sec. 22-65. Form of deed. A tax deed executed by the county 12clerk under the official seal of the county shall be recorded 13in the same manner as other conveyances of property, and vests 14in the grantee, his or her heirs and assigns, the title of the 15property therein described without further acknowledgment or 16evidence of the conveyance. Tax deeds issued under this 17Section shall not require a municipal transfer stamp or be 18subject to any municipal real estate transfer taxes, 19requirements, or certifications prior to recording. The 20conveyance shall be substantially in the following form:21State of Illinois) 22                 ) ss. 23County of .......)24    At a judicial tax deed auction public sale of property for 25the nonpayment of taxes, held in the county above stated, on   HB0799 Engrossed- 55 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b1(insert date), the following described property was sold: 2(here place description of property conveyed). The property 3not having been redeemed from the sale, and it appearing that 4the holder of the certificate of purchase of the property has 5complied with the laws of the State of Illinois necessary to 6entitle the holder (insert him, her or them) to a deed of the 7property: I ...., county clerk of the county of ...., in 8consideration of the premises property and by virtue of the 9statutes of the State of Illinois in such cases provided, 10grant and convey to ...., his or her heirs and assigns forever, 11the property described above.12    Dated (insert date).13Signature of .................. County Clerk14Seal of County of ...., Illinois15(Source: P.A. 91-357, eff. 7-29-99.) 16    Section 95. Applicability. The changes made by this 17amendatory Act apply only to tax certificates issued on or 18after July 1, 2026. Nothing in this amendatory Act applies to 19tax deeds issued before July 1, 2026, certificates issued 20before July 1, 2026, or any claim arising from a tax sale or 21tax deed occurring before July 1, 2026. 22    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 23severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1,   HB0799 Engrossed- 56 -LRB104 04698 HLH 14725 b12026.